Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202283-191
Board of Parole; members; restriction on activities; salary.

The members of the Board of Parole shall devote full time to their duties with such board and shall not engage in any other business or profession or hold any other public office. No member shall, at the time of his or her appointment or during his or her tenure, serve as the representative of any political party or of any executive committee or governing body thereof or as an executive officer or employee of any political party, organization, association, or committee. A member shall resign from the board upon filing as a candidate for any elective public office. Each member of the board shall receive an annual salary to be fixed by the Governor. Such salaries shall be paid in equal monthly portions.

Laws 1969, c. 817, § 22, p. 3085;

Laws 1973, LB 524, § 3;

Laws 1987, LB 603, § 3;

Laws 1992, Third Spec. Sess., LB 13, § 2;

Laws 1994, LB 677, § 5;

Laws 2018, LB841, § 21.